Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.110

Regional noxious weed control board—Creation.

A regional noxious weed control board comprising the area of two or more counties may be created as follows:

Either the county legislative authority, or the noxious weed control board, or both, of two or more counties may, upon a determination that the purpose of this chapter will be served by the creation of a regional noxious weed control board, adopt a resolution providing for a limited merger of the functions of their respective counties noxious weed control boards. The resolution becomes effective only when a similar resolution is adopted by the other county or counties comprising the proposed regional board.

[ 1997 c 353 s 13; 1987 c 438 s 11; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 113 s 11.]